Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 3. Collection

§ 7521.
Charge imposed; wholesale exemption.

A Universal Service Charge is imposed on all retail telecommunications service provided to a Vermont address. Where the location of a service and the location receiving the bill differ, the location of the service shall be used to determine whether the Charge applies. The Charge is imposed on the person purchasing the service, but shall be collected by the telecommunications provider. Each telecommunications service provider shall include in its tariffs filed at the Public Utility Commission a description of its billing procedures for the Universal Service Charge.

The Universal Service Charge shall not apply to wholesale transactions between telecommunications service providers where the service is a component part of a service provided to an end user. This exemption includes network access charges and interconnection charges paid to a local exchange carrier.

In the case of mobile telecommunications service, the Universal Service Charge is imposed when the customer’s place of primary use is in Vermont. The terms “customer,” “place of primary use,” and “mobile telecommunications service” have the meanings given in 4 U.S.C. § 124. All provisions of

32 V.S.A. § 9782

shall apply to the imposition of the Universal Service Charge under this section.

[Repealed.]

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, beginning on January 1, 2020, the Universal Service Charge shall be imposed on all retail sales of prepaid wireless telecommunications service subject to the sales and use tax imposed under 32 V.S.A. chapter 233. The charges shall be collected by sellers or marketplace facilitators collecting sales tax pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 9713

and remitted to the Department of Taxes in the manner provided under 32 V.S.A. chapter 233. Upon receipt of the charges, the Department of Taxes shall have 30 days to remit the funds to the fiscal agent selected under section 7503 of this chapter. The Commissioner of Taxes shall establish registration and payment procedures applicable to the Universal Service Charge imposed under this subsection consistent with the registration and payment procedures that apply to the sales tax imposed on such services and also consistent with the administrative provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 151, including any enforcement or collection action available for taxes owed pursuant to that chapter.
(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, beginning on January 1, 2020, the Universal Service Charge shall be imposed on all retail sales of prepaid wireless telecommunications service subject to the sales and use tax imposed under 32 V.S.A. chapter 233. The charges shall be collected by sellers or marketplace facilitators collecting sales tax pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 9713

and remitted to the Department of Taxes in the manner provided under 32 V.S.A. chapter 233. Upon receipt of the charges, the Department of Taxes shall have 30 days to remit the funds to the fiscal agent selected under section 7503 of this chapter. The Commissioner of Taxes shall establish registration and payment procedures applicable to the Universal Service Charge imposed under this subsection consistent with the registration and payment procedures that apply to the sales tax imposed on such services and also consistent with the administrative provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 151, including any enforcement or collection action available for taxes owed pursuant to that chapter.

If a minimal amount of prepaid wireless telecommunications service is sold with a prepaid wireless device for a single, nonitemized price, then the seller may elect not to apply the Universal Service Charge to such transaction.

As used in this subsection:

“Minimal amount” means an amount of service denominated as not more than 10 minutes or not more than $5.00.

“Prepaid wireless telecommunications service” means a telecommunications service as defined in subdivision 203(5) of this title that a consumer pays for in advance and that is sold in predetermined units or dollars that decline with use.

“Seller” means a person who sells prepaid wireless telecommunications service to a consumer.

“Marketplace facilitator” shall have the same meaning as in

32 V.S.A. § 9701(56)

.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Oct. 1, 1994; amended

2001, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 36;

2013, No. 191

(Adj. Sess.), § 29;

2019, No. 79

, § 6, eff. Jan. 1, 2020;

2019, No. 79

, § 7, eff. June 20, 2019;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 290;

2019, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. July 1, 2021.

§ 7522.
Rebate for payment elsewhere.

When a telecommunications service is subject to the Charge imposed by section 7521 of this title and also to a similar charge imposed for similar purposes in another state, the customer shall be liable only for the difference between the amount demonstrably paid in the other state and the amount due in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

See note set out preceding § 7501 of this title.

§ 7523.
Rate of charge.

Beginning on July 1, 2014, the rate of charge shall be two percent of retail telecommunications service.

Beginning on July 1, 2019, the rate of charge established under subsection (a) of this section shall be increased by four-tenths of one percent of retail telecommunications service, and the monies collected from this increase shall be transferred to the Vermont Community Broadband Fund established under section 8083 of this title, and up to $120,000.00 shall be used to fund a Rural Broadband Technical Assistance Specialist whose duties shall include providing outreach, technical assistance, and other support services to communications union districts established pursuant to chapter 82 of this title and other units of government, nonprofit organizations, cooperatives, and for-profit businesses for the purpose of expanding broadband service to unserved and underserved locations. Support services also may include providing business model templates for various approaches, including formation of or partnership with a cooperative, a communications union district, a rural economic development infrastructure district, an electric utility, or a new or existing Internet service provider as operator of the network.

Universal Service Charges imposed and collected by the fiscal agent under this subchapter shall not be transferred to any other fund or used to support the cost of any activity other than in the manner authorized by this section and section 7511 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

1995, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 22, 1996;

2005, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. June 16, 2014;

2019, No. 79

, § 2, eff. June 20, 2019;

2021, No. 71

, § 7b, eff. June 8, 2021.

§ 7524.
Payment to fiscal agent.

Telecommunications service providers shall pay to the fiscal agent all Universal Service Charge receipts collected from customers. A report in a form approved by the Department of Public Service shall be included with each payment.

Payments shall be made monthly, by the 15th day of the month, and shall be based upon amounts collected in the preceding month. If the amount is small, the Commissioner may allow payment to be made less frequently, and may permit payment on an accrual basis.

Telecommunications service providers shall maintain records adequate to demonstrate compliance with the requirements of this chapter. The Commissioner or the fiscal agent may examine those records in a reasonable manner.

When a payment is due under this section by a telecommunications service provider who has provided customer credits under the Lifeline program, the amount due may be reduced by the amount of credit granted.

The fiscal agent shall examine the records of telecommunications service providers to determine whether their receipts reflect application of the Universal Service Charge on all assessable telecommunications services under this chapter, including the federal subscriber line charge, directory assistance, enhanced services unless they are billed as separate line items, and toll-related services.

The Department of Public Service shall ensure the fiscal agent is authorized to negotiate and collect from telecommunications service providers any Universal Service Charges not properly assessed or remitted pursuant to this chapter. For the purpose of this subsection, the fiscal agent may examine the records of telecommunications providers for the immediately preceding three years and assess the provider for underpayments, if any, as appropriate.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

1995, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

1995, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 22, 1996;

2013, No. 191

(Adj. Sess.), § 30;

2015, No. 41

, § 26, eff. June 1, 2015.

§ 7525.
Delinquent payments.

If a report required by this chapter is not filed, or if a report when filed is incorrect or insufficient, or if a provider fails to bill and collect amounts required by this chapter, the fiscal agent shall determine a delinquency from information available and shall so inform the provider.

Interest shall be charged on delinquent payments to the fiscal agent at the rate of 1.5 percent per month or part thereof.

The Public Utility Commission may hear appeals from any determinations of delinquency made by the fiscal agent. Any such determination shall become final if not so appealed within 60 days of its issuance.

Upon petition of the fiscal agent, the Public Utility Commission may impose, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, civil penalties against a telecommunications service provider who is delinquent in making payments to the fiscal agent. Any penalty imposed may be based upon the size and duration of the violation, but no such penalty shall exceed twice the amount of the delinquency or $1,000.00, whichever is larger.

A telecommunications service provider who has filed reports required by this chapter shall not be liable for delinquent payments that were due more than three years before the fiscal agent gave notice of delinquency to the provider.

Payments, interest, and penalties due under this chapter may be collected by civil actions in the courts of this State initiated in the name of the State or fiscal agent.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

1995, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2005, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.